North Carolina, session 2025, SB161.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Jenesis Firearm Accountability Act."
SECTION 2. The purpose of this act is to do all of the following:
(1) Enhance public safety by aiding law enforcement in tracking lost or stolen
firearms.
(2) Deter gun crimes by ensuring timely reporting of lost or stolen firearms.
(3) Protect law-abiding gun owners by preventing illegal firearm trafficking and
reducing criminal misuse.
SECTION 3. Article 53A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-409.13. Report of loss or theft of firearm.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Firearm. – As defined in G.S. 14-409.39.
(2) Law enforcement agency. – Any municipal, county, or State law enforcement
agency with jurisdiction.
(3) Lost or stolen. – Includes a firearm that has been misplaced, taken without the
owner's consent, or is otherwise unaccounted for.
(b) Requirement. – A person who owns, possesses, or otherwise controls a firearm that is
lost or stolen shall report the loss or theft to a law enforcement agency within 48 hours of
discovering the firearm is lost or stolen. The report required under this subsection shall include
all of the following, if known:
(1) The make, model, caliber, and serial number of the firearm.
(2) The date and location where the firearm was lost or stolen.
(3) The type and approximate number of rounds of ammunition stolen, if
applicable.
(4) Any additional information required by the law enforcement agency.
(c) Punishment. – Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a
violation of this section is an infraction that shall be punished as follows:
(1) For a first offense, a person shall only receive a written warning.
*S161-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) For a second offense, a person shall be fined an amount up to five hundred
dollars ($500.00).
(3) For a third or subsequent offense, a person shall be fined an amount up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(d) Additional Punishment. – In addition to the punishment set forth in subsection (c) of
this section, a person who fails to report a lost or stolen firearm in accordance with this section
and the firearm is used in the commission of a criminal offense may be liable for civil damages
to any person injured as a result of the offense. If the firearm is used in the commission of a
violent felony or misdemeanor, as defined in G.S. 15A-145.6, the person who failed to report the
lost or stolen firearm in accordance with this section shall be guilty of the same level of offense
as the offense in which the firearm was used unless the person demonstrates to the court a
reasonable inability to have complied with the requirements of this section.
(e) Immunity. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person who
reports a lost or stolen firearm in accordance with this section shall not be subject to civil or
criminal liability for any criminal offenses committed with the firearm after the report is made.
(f) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the creation of
a firearm registry or require firearm owners to disclose ownership of firearms that have not been
lost or stolen."
SECTION 4. G.S. 105-164.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13. Retail sales and use tax.
The sale at retail and the use, storage, or consumption in this State of the following items are
specifically exempted from the tax imposed by this Article:
…
(76) Equipment designed to prevent unauthorized access to firearms, including (i)
a device that, when installed on a firearm, is designed to prevent the firearm
from being operated without first deactivating the device or (ii) a gun safe,
gun case, lockbox, or other device that is for home use and is designed, in light
of materials used, to prevent access to a firearm by any means other than a
key, a combination, biometric data, or other similar means. The equipment
exempted under this subdivision does not include a glass-faced cabinet or
other form of storage that is primarily designed to allow for the display of
firearms."
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to develop and implement an educational campaign to make the
public aware of the responsibility set forth in G.S. 14-409.13, as enacted by Section 3 of this act.
The Department of Public Safety shall consult with the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association and
the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police in developing and implementing the campaign
required under this section.
SECTION 6. Sections 3 and 4 of this act become effective October 1, 2025, and
apply to (i) sales made on or after that date and (ii) offenses committed on or after that date. The
remainder of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 161-First Edition